Hawaii statutes.
§328-18 Cosmetics deemed adulterated when.
A cosmetic shall be deemed to be adulterated:

(1) If it bears or contains any poisonous or
deleterious substance which may render it injurious to users under the
conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof, or under
such conditions of use as are customary or usual; provided that this provision
shall not apply to coal-tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following
legend conspicuously displayed thereon: "Caution--This product contains
ingredients which may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a
preliminary test according to accompanying directions should first be made.
This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so
may cause blindness", and the labeling of which bears adequate directions
for such preliminary testing. For the purposes of this paragraph and paragraph
(5) the term "hair dye" shall not include eyelash dyes or eyebrow
dyes;

(2) If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy,
putrid, or decomposed substance;

(3) If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or
held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with
filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;

(4) If its container is composed, in whole or in
part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents
injurious to health;

(5) If it is not a hair dye and it is or bears or
contains a color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of the Federal
Act. [L 1941, c 318, §13; RL 1945, §2217; RL 1955, §51-17; am L 1967, c 152,
§12; HRS §328-18]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next